Utah statutes.
41-6a-1628.   Seat belts -- Design and installation -- Specifications or requirements.

(1)  A safety belt installed in a vehicle to accommodate an adult person shall be designed and installed to prevent or materially reduce the movement of the person using the safety belt in the event of collision or upset of the vehicle.

(2)  A person may not sell, offer, or keep for sale a safety belt or attachments for use in a vehicle that does not comply with the specifications under Section 41-6a-1601.

